Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1844
Crime Victim and Witness Assistance Fund; created; administration; use.

There is hereby created a fund to be known as the Crime Victim and Witness Assistance Fund. Such fund shall contain such amounts as may be appropriated by the Legislature and shall be used only for the purposes set forth in sections 81-1843 to 81-1851. Such fund shall be administered by the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice.

Laws 1981, LB 477, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 270, § 8.